Utah statutes.
53B-8d-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Division" means the Division of Child and Family Services.

(2)  "Long-term foster care" means an individual who remains in the custody of the division, whether or not the individual resides:

(a)  with licensed foster parents; or

(b)  in independent living arrangements under the supervision of the division.

(3)  "State institution of higher education" means:

(a)  those institutions designated in Section 53B-1-102; and

(b)  any public institution that offers postsecondary education in consideration of the payment of tuition or fees for the attainment of educational or vocational objectives leading to a degree or certificate, including:

(i)  business schools;

(ii)  technical schools;

(iii)  applied technology centers;

(iv)  trade schools; and

(v)  institutions offering related apprenticeship programs.

(4) "Tuition" means tuition at the rate for residents of the state.

(5)  "Ward of the state" means an individual:

(a)  who is:

(i)  at least 17 years of age; and

(ii)  not older than 26 years of age;

(b)  who had a permanency goal in the individual's child and family plan, as described in Sections 62A-4a-205 and 78A-6-314, of long-term foster care while in the custody of the division; and

(c)  for whom the custody of the division was not terminated as a result of adoption.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

